Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.7151

Board of trustees—Political party representation.

The legislative board members appointed under RCW 41.26.715 must include one member from the two largest political parties. The speaker of the house of representatives shall request a recommendation from the minority leader of the house of representatives if a member from the opposite party must be recommended for appointment. The majority leader of the senate shall request a recommendation from the minority leader of the senate if a member from the opposite party must be recommended for appointment.

[ 2007 c 303 s 2.]